test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-xaTS_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - ха: # Noun 'ear / (fin) korva' - partial paradigm /Type +w+o/ - xa
     ха+N+Sg+Nom: ха
     ха+N+Sg+Acc: хамʼ
     ха+N+Sg+Gen: хаʼ
     ха+N+Sg+Dat: ханʼ
     ха+N+Sg+Loc: хахана
     ха+N+Sg+Abl: хахад
     ха+N+Sg+Pros: хавна
     ха+N+Du+Nom: хахаʼ
     ха+N+Du+Acc: хахаʼ
     ха+N+Du+Gen: хахаʼ
     ха+N+Pl+Nom: хаˮ
     ха+N+Pl+Acc: хаво
     ха+N+Pl+Gen: хавоˮ
     ха+N+Pl+Dat: хахаˮ
     ха+N+Pl+Loc: хахаˮна
     ха+N+Pl+Abl: хахат
     ха+N+Pl+Pros: хавоˮмана
     ха+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1: [хав, хами]
     ха+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg1: [хав, хами]
     ха+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg1: [хан, хани]
     ха+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg1: [хахан, хахани]
     ха+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg1: [хаханан, хаханани]
     ха+N+Sg+Abl+PxSg1: [хахадан, хахадани]
     ха+N+Sg+Pros+PxSg1: [хавнан, хавнани]
     ха+N+Du+Nom+PxSg1: [хахаюн, хахаюни]
     ха+N+Du+Acc+PxSg1: [хахаюн, хахаюни]
     ха+N+Du+Gen+PxSg1: [хахаюн, хахаюни]
     ха+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg1: [хавон, хавони]
     ха+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg1: [хавон, хавони]
     ха+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg1: [хавоˮн, хавоˮни]
     ха+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg1: [хахаˮн, хахаˮни]
     ха+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg1: [хахаˮнан, хахаˮнани]
     ха+N+Pl+Abl+PxSg1: [хахатан, хахатани]
     ха+N+Pl+Pros+PxSg1: [хавоˮманан, хавоˮманани]
     ха+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2: хар
     ха+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg2: хамд
     ха+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg2: ханд
     ха+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg2: хаханд
     ха+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg2: хахананд
     ха+N+Sg+Abl+PxSg2: хахаданд
     ха+N+Sg+Pros+PxSg2: хавнанд
     ха+N+Du+Nom+PxSg2: хахаюд
     ха+N+Du+Acc+PxSg2: хахаюд
     ха+N+Du+Gen+PxSg2: хахают
     ха+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg2: хавод
     ха+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg2: хавод
     ха+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg2: хавот
     ха+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg2: хахат
     ха+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg2: хахаˮнат
     ха+N+Pl+Abl+PxSg2: хахатат
     ха+N+Pl+Pros+PxSg2: хавоˮманат
     ха+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3: хада
     ха+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg3: хамда
     ха+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg3: ханда
     ха+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg3: хаханда
     ха+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg3: хахананда
     ха+N+Sg+Abl+PxSg3: хахаданда
     ха+N+Sg+Pros+PxSg3: хавнанда
     ха+N+Du+Nom+PxSg3: хахаюда
     ха+N+Du+Acc+PxSg3: хахаюда
     ха+N+Du+Gen+PxSg3: хахаюта
     ха+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg3: хавода
     ха+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg3: хавода
     ха+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg3: хавота
     ха+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg3: хахата
     ха+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg3: хахаˮната
     ха+N+Pl+Abl+PxSg3: хахатата
     ха+N+Pl+Pros+PxSg3: хавоˮманата
     ха+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu1: хамиʼ
#     ха+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1.2: хами
     ха+N+Sg+Acc+PxDu1: хамиʼ
#     ха+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg1.2: хами
     ха+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu1: ханиʼ
#     ха+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg1.2: хани
     ха+N+Sg+Dat+PxDu1: хаханиʼ
#     ха+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg1.2: хахани
     ха+N+Sg+Loc+PxDu1: хахананиʼ
#     ха+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg1.2: хаханани
     ха+N+Sg+Abl+PxDu1: хахаданиʼ
#     ха+N+Sg+Abl+PxSg1.2: хахадани
     ха+N+Sg+Pros+PxDu1: хавнаниʼ
#     ха+N+Sg+Pros+PxSg1.2: хавнани
     ха+N+Du+Nom+PxDu1: хахаюниʼ
#     ха+N+Du+Nom+PxSg1.2: хахаюни
     ха+N+Du+Acc+PxDu1: хахаюниʼ
#     ха+N+Du+Acc+PxSg1.2: хахаюни
     ха+N+Du+Gen+PxDu1: хахаюниʼ
#     ха+N+Du+Gen+PxSg1.2: хахаюни
     ха+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu1: хавониʼ
#     ха+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg1.2: хавони
     ха+N+Pl+Acc+PxDu1: хавониʼ
#     ха+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg1.2: хавони
     ха+N+Pl+Gen+PxDu1: хавоˮниʼ
#     ха+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg1.2: хавоˮни
     ха+N+Pl+Dat+PxDu1: хахаˮниʼ
#     ха+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg1.2: хахаˮни
     ха+N+Pl+Loc+PxDu1: хахаˮнаниʼ
#     ха+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg1.2: хахаˮнани
     ха+N+Pl+Abl+PxDu1: хахатаниʼ
#     ха+N+Pl+Abl+PxSg1.2: хахатани
     ха+N+Pl+Pros+PxDu1: хавоˮмананиʼ
#     ха+N+Pl+Pros+PxSg1.2: хавоˮманани
     ха+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu2: хариʼ
     ха+N+Sg+Acc+PxDu2: хамдиʼ
     ха+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu2: хандиʼ
     ха+N+Sg+Dat+PxDu2: хахандиʼ
     ха+N+Sg+Loc+PxDu2: хаханандиʼ
     ха+N+Sg+Abl+PxDu2: хахадандиʼ
     ха+N+Sg+Pros+PxDu2: хавнандиʼ
     ха+N+Du+Nom+PxDu2: хахаюдиʼ
     ха+N+Du+Acc+PxDu2: хахаюдиʼ
     ха+N+Du+Gen+PxDu2: хахаютиʼ
     ха+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu2: хаводиʼ
     ха+N+Pl+Acc+PxDu2: хаводиʼ
     ха+N+Pl+Gen+PxDu2: хавотиʼ
     ха+N+Pl+Dat+PxDu2: хахатиʼ
     ха+N+Pl+Loc+PxDu2: хахаˮнатиʼ
     ха+N+Pl+Abl+PxDu2: хахататиʼ
     ха+N+Pl+Pros+PxDu2: хавоˮманатиʼ
     ха+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu3: хадиʼ
     ха+N+Sg+Acc+PxDu3: хамдиʼ
     ха+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu3: хандиʼ
     ха+N+Sg+Dat+PxDu3: хахандиʼ
     ха+N+Sg+Loc+PxDu3: хаханандиʼ
     ха+N+Sg+Abl+PxDu3: хахадандиʼ
     ха+N+Sg+Pros+PxDu3: хавнандиʼ
     ха+N+Du+Nom+PxDu3: хахаюдиʼ
     ха+N+Du+Acc+PxDu3: хахаюдиʼ
     ха+N+Du+Gen+PxDu3: хахаютиʼ
     ха+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu3: хаводиʼ
     ха+N+Pl+Acc+PxDu3: хаводиʼ
     ха+N+Pl+Gen+PxDu3: хавотиʼ
     ха+N+Pl+Dat+PxDu3: хахатиʼ
     ха+N+Pl+Loc+PxDu3: хахаˮнатиʼ
     ха+N+Pl+Abl+PxDu3: хахататиʼ
     ха+N+Pl+Pros+PxDu3: хавоˮманатиʼ
     ха+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl1: хаваˮ
     ха+N+Sg+Acc+PxPl1: хаваˮ
     ха+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl1: ханаˮ
     ха+N+Sg+Dat+PxPl1: хаханаˮ
     ха+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl1: хахананаˮ
     ха+N+Sg+Abl+PxPl1: хахаданаˮ
     ха+N+Sg+Pros+PxPl1: хавнанаˮ
     ха+N+Du+Nom+PxPl1: хахаюнаˮ
     ха+N+Du+Acc+PxPl1: хахаюнаˮ
     ха+N+Du+Gen+PxPl1: хахаюнаˮ
     ха+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl1: хавонаˮ
     ха+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl1: хавонаˮ
     ха+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl1: хавоˮнаˮ
     ха+N+Pl+Dat+PxPl1: хахаˮнаˮ
     ха+N+Pl+Loc+PxPl1: хахаˮнанаˮ
     ха+N+Pl+Abl+PxPl1: хахатанаˮ
     ха+N+Pl+Pros+PxPl1: хавоˮмананаˮ
     ха+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl2: хараˮ
     ха+N+Sg+Acc+PxPl2: хамдаˮ
     ха+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl2: хандаˮ
     ха+N+Sg+Dat+PxPl2: хахандаˮ
     ха+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl2: хаханандаˮ
     ха+N+Sg+Abl+PxPl2: хахадандаˮ
     ха+N+Sg+Pros+PxPl2: хавнандаˮ
     ха+N+Du+Nom+PxPl2: хахаюдаˮ
     ха+N+Du+Acc+PxPl2: хахаюдаˮ
     ха+N+Du+Gen+PxPl2: хахаютаˮ
     ха+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl2: хаводаˮ
     ха+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl2: хаводаˮ
     ха+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl2: хавотаˮ
     ха+N+Pl+Dat+PxPl2: хахатаˮ
     ха+N+Pl+Loc+PxPl2: хахаˮнатаˮ
     ха+N+Pl+Abl+PxPl2: хахататаˮ
     ха+N+Pl+Pros+PxPl2: хавоˮманатаˮ
     ха+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl3: хадоʼ
     ха+N+Sg+Acc+PxPl3: хамдоʼ
     ха+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl3: хандоʼ
     ха+N+Sg+Dat+PxPl3: хахандоʼ
     ха+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl3: хаханандоʼ
     ха+N+Sg+Abl+PxPl3: хахадандоʼ
     ха+N+Sg+Pros+PxPl3: хавнандоʼ
     ха+N+Du+Nom+PxPl3: хахаюдоʼ
     ха+N+Du+Acc+PxPl3: хахаюдоʼ
     ха+N+Du+Gen+PxPl3: хахаютоʼ
     ха+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl3: хаводоʼ
     ха+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl3: хаводоʼ
     ха+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl3: хавотоʼ
     ха+N+Pl+Dat+PxPl3: хахатоʼ
     ха+N+Pl+Loc+PxPl3: хахаˮнатоʼ
     ха+N+Pl+Abl+PxPl3: хахататоʼ
     ха+N+Pl+Pros+PxPl3: хавоˮманатоʼ
     ха+N+Pred+Abs: хад
     ха+N+Pred+Nom+PxSg1: [хадав, хадув, хадами, хадми]
     ха+N+Pred+Acc+PxSg1: [хадав, хадув, хадами, хадми]
     ха+N+Pred+Gen+PxSg1: [хадан, хадани, хадни]
     ха+N+Pred+Nom+PxSg2: хадар
     ха+N+Pred+Acc+PxSg2: хадамд
     ха+N+Pred+Gen+PxSg2: хаданд
     ха+N+Pred+Nom+PxSg3: [хадада, хадда]
     ха+N+Pred+Acc+PxSg3: хадамда
     ха+N+Pred+Gen+PxSg3: хаданда
     ха+N+Pred+Nom+PxDu1: [хадамиʼ, хадмиʼ]
#     ха+N+Pred+Nom+PxSg1.2: [хадами, хадми]
     ха+N+Pred+Acc+PxDu1: [хадамиʼ, хадмиʼ]
#     ха+N+Pred+Acc+PxSg1.2: [хадами, хадми]
     ха+N+Pred+Gen+PxDu1: [хаданиʼ, хадниʼ]
#     ха+N+Pred+Gen+PxSg1.2: [хадани, хадни]
     ха+N+Pred+Nom+PxDu2: [хадариʼ, хадриʼ]
     ха+N+Pred+Acc+PxDu2: хадамдиʼ
     ха+N+Pred+Gen+PxDu2: хадандиʼ
     ха+N+Pred+Nom+PxDu3: [хададиʼ, хаддиʼ]
     ха+N+Pred+Acc+PxDu3: хадамдиʼ
     ха+N+Pred+Gen+PxDu3: хадандиʼ
     ха+N+Pred+Nom+PxPl1: [хадаваˮ, хадваˮ]
     ха+N+Pred+Acc+PxPl1: [хадаваˮ, хадваˮ]
     ха+N+Pred+Gen+PxPl1: [хаданаˮ, хаднаˮ]
     ха+N+Pred+Nom+PxPl2: [хадараˮ, хадраˮ]
     ха+N+Pred+Acc+PxPl2: хадамдаˮ
     ха+N+Pred+Gen+PxPl2: хадандаˮ
     ха+N+Pred+Nom+PxPl3: [хададоʼ, хаддоʼ]
     ха+N+Pred+Acc+PxPl3: хадамдоʼ
     ха+N+Pred+Gen+PxPl3: хадандоʼ
     ха+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg1: хадмʼ
     ха+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg2: хан
     ха+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: ха
     ха+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu1: ханиʼ
     ха+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu2: хадиʼ
     ха+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: хахаʼ
     ха+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl1: хаваˮ
     ха+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl2: хадаˮ
     ха+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: хаˮ
     ха+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg1: хадамзь
     ха+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg2: ханась
     ха+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: хась
     ха+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu1: ханинзь
     ха+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu2: хадинзь
     ха+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: хаханзь
     ха+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl1: хаваць
     ха+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl2: хадаць
     ха+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: хаць
     ха+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: хав
     ха+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: хар
     ха+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: хада
     ха+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: хамиʼ
     ха+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: хариʼ
     ха+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: хадиʼ
     ха+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: хаваˮ
     ха+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: хараˮ
     ха+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: хадоʼ
     ха+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: хавась
     ха+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: харась
     ха+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: хадась
     ха+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: хаминзь
     ха+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: харинзь
     ха+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: хадинзь
     ха+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: хаваць
     ха+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: хараць
     ха+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: хадонзь
     ха+N+Du+Nom+PxSg1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: хахаюн
     ха+N+Du+Nom+PxSg2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: хахаюд
     ха+N+Du+Nom+PxSg3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: хахаюда
     ха+N+Du+Nom+PxDu1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: хахаюниʼ
     ха+N+Du+Nom+PxDu2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: хахаюдиʼ
     ха+N+Du+Nom+PxDu3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: хахаюдиʼ
     ха+N+Du+Nom+PxPl1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: хахаюнаˮ
     ха+N+Du+Nom+PxPl2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: хахаюдаˮ
     ха+N+Du+Nom+PxPl3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: хахаюдоʼ
     ха+N+Du+Nom+PxSg1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: хахаюнась
     ха+N+Du+Nom+PxSg2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: хахаюдась
     ха+N+Du+Nom+PxSg3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: хахаюдась
     ха+N+Du+Nom+PxDu1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: хахаюнинзь
     ха+N+Du+Nom+PxDu2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: хахаюдинзь
     ха+N+Du+Nom+PxDu3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: хахаюдинзь
     ха+N+Du+Nom+PxPl1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: хахаюнаць
     ха+N+Du+Nom+PxPl2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: хахаюдаць
     ха+N+Du+Nom+PxPl3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: хахаюдонзь
     ха+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: хавон
     ха+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: хавод
     ха+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: хавода
     ха+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: хавониʼ
     ха+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: хаводиʼ
     ха+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: хаводиʼ
     ха+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: хавонаˮ
     ха+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: хаводаˮ
     ха+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: хаводоʼ
     ха+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: хавонась
     ха+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: хаводась
     ха+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: хаводась
     ха+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: хавонинзь
     ха+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: хаводинзь
     ха+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: хаводинзь
     ха+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: хавонаць
     ха+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: хаводаць
     ха+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: хаводонзь
     ха+N+Tra: хаӈэ
     ха+N+Car: хасиˮ
     ха+N+Equ: хадремʼ
     ха+N+Equ+Lat: хадревʼ
